Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 6. Bestiality.

History.

2021 ch. 39, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 6-4-601.
Bestiality; penalty.

As used in this section:

“Actor” means the person accused of bestiality;

“Sexual act with an animal” means any act, between a person and an animal involving direct physical contact between the genitals of one and the mouth, anus or genitals of the other. A sexual act with an animal may be proved without evidence of penetration.

An actor commits the crime of bestiality if the actor knowingly:

Engages in a sexual act with an animal;

Causes, aids or abets another in engaging in a sexual act with an animal;

Uses any part of the actor’s body or an object to sexually stimulate an animal; or

For the purpose of sexual gratification, the actor visually records a person engaging in a sexual act with an animal.

Bestiality is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both.

This section shall not apply to or prohibit normal, ordinary or accepted practices involved in animal husbandry, artificial insemination or veterinary medicine.

History.

2021 ch. 39, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 39, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.